Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-324
Nebraska Arts Council; insure compliance with act; manner.

The Nebraska Arts Council shall inform the Director of Administrative Services that sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03 have been complied with for each project subject to section 82-319 before a warrant may be issued for payment.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 8.